bg-BG: Офис консумативи: Аксесоари за книги; Подложки за бюро; Картотека и организация; Общи офис консумативи; Импулсни машини за запечатване на опаковки; Бюра за скута; Табелки за имена; Постелки за офиса и столове; Колички за офиса; Офис оборудване; Офис инструменти; Обработване на хартия; Консумативи за презентации; Консумативи за доставка
da: Kontorforsyning: Bøger – tilbehør; Skriveunderlag; Arkivering og organisering; Generelle forbrugsvarer; Forseglingsmaskiner; Skriveborde til bærbare computere; Navneskilte; Kontormåtter og stoleunderlag; Kontorvogne; Kontorudstyr; Kontorredskaber; Papirhåndtering; Præsentationsmaterialer; Forsendelsesmaterialer
pt-PT: Materiais de escritório: Acessórios para livros; Proteções e bases para secretárias; Arquivo e organização; Consumíveis de escritório gerais; Máquinas de selar; Mesas para computadores portáteis; Placas de identificação; Tapetes para escritório e cadeiras; Carrinhos para escritório; Equipamento de escritório; Material de escritório; Processamento de papel; Materiais de apresentação; Materiais de envio
vi: Văn phòng phẩm: Phụ kiện cho sách; Tấm đệm bàn; Kẹp tài liệu và ngăn chia tài liệu; Văn phòng phẩm thông dụng; Máy hàn miệng túi dập tay; Bàn làm việc ngồi bệt; Biển đề tên; Thảm ghế và thảm văn phòng; Xe đẩy văn phòng; Thiết bị văn phòng; Dụng cụ văn phòng; Xử lý giấy; Thiết bị thuyết trình; Đồ dùng chuyển hàng
ko: 사무용품: 독서용품; 책상 패드/블로터; 서류 정리 용품; 일반 사무용품; 비닐 접착기; 무릎 책상; 명판; 사무실/의자 매트; 사무용 카트; 사무기기; 사무기구; 용지 취급; 프레젠테이션 용품; 배송 용품
lt-LT: Biuro reikmenys: Knygų priedai; Stalo kilimėliai; Bylų saugojimas ir tvarkymas; Bendrosios paskirties biuro reikmenys; Impulsiniai sandarikliai; Skreitiniai padėklai; Vardinės lentelės; Biuro ir kėdžių kilimėliai; Biuro vežimėliai; Biuro įranga; Biuro instrumentai; Popieriaus tvarkymas; Pristatymų reikmenys; Transportavimo reikmenys
en: Office Supplies: Book Accessories; Desk Pads & Blotters; Filing & Organization; General Office Supplies; Impulse Sealers; Lap Desks; Name Plates; Office & Chair Mats; Office Carts; Office Equipment; Office Instruments; Paper Handling; Presentation Supplies; Shipping Supplies
cs: Kancelářské potřeby: Doplňky ke knihám; Stolní podložky; Třídění a uspořádání dokumentů; Obecné kancelářské potřeby; Svářečky igelitových sáčků; Podložky k notebookům a na psaní; Jmenovky; Podložky do kanceláře a pod židli; Kancelářské vozíky; Kancelářské vybavení; Kancelářské nástroje; Práce s papírem; Prezentační materiály; Balicí potřeby
fr: Fournitures de bureau: Accessoires pour livres; Sous-mains; Classement et organisation; Fournitures de bureau générales; Soudeuses à impulsion; Supports pour ordinateurs portables; Plaques nominatives; Tapis de bureau et de chaise; Chariots de bureau; Équipement de bureau; Accessoires de bureau; Traitement du papier; Matériel de présentation et d'affichage; Fournitures d'expédition
de: Bürobedarf: Bücherzubehör; Schreibtischunterlagen; Ablage & Organisation; Schreibwaren; Impulsschweißgeräte; Laptophalter; Namensschilder; Büromatten & Stuhlunterlagen; Bürowagen; Bürogeräte; Büroarbeitsmittel; Papierbearbeitung; Präsentationsbedarf; Versandbedarf
nl: Kantoorartikelen: Boekaccessoires; Bureauonderleggers en vloeibladen; Archiveren en indelen; Algemene kantoorbenodigdheden; Impulssealers; Schootbureaus; Naamplaatjes; Kantoor- en stoelmatten; Kantoorkarren; Kantoorapparaten; Kantoorbenodigdheden; Papierverwerking; Presentatiebenodigdheden; Verzendbenodigdheden
ru: Товары для офиса и канцтовары: Аксессуары для книг; Настольные коврики; Органайзеры и товары для хранения документов; Канцтовары общего назначения; Импульсные запайщики пакетов; Наколенные столики; Именные таблички; Офисные коврики; Офисные тележки; Офисная техника; Офисные принадлежности; Работа с бумагой; Товары для проведения презентаций; Товары для упаковки грузов
zh-CN: 办公用品: 书籍用具; 桌垫; 文件整理; 一般办公用品; 脉冲热封机; 笔记本电脑托架; 名牌; 办公室/椅子地垫; 办公室手推车; 办公设备; 办公文具; 纸张处理; 演示用品; 包装快递用品
hr-HR: Uredski materijal: Dodaci za čitanje; Podloge za radni stol; Pohrana i organizacija; Opći uredski materijal; Aparati za varenje vrećica; Podloga za prijenosna računala; Pločice s imenima; Prostirke za ured i stolice; Uredska kolica; Uredska oprema; Uredski uređaji; Rukovanje papirom; Prezentacijski pribor; Pribor za otpremanje
el: Προμήθειες γραφείου: Αξεσουάρ βιβλίου; Σημειωματάρια & υποθέματα γραφής; Αρχειοθέτηση & οργάνωση; Γενικά είδη γραφείου; Μηχανές σφράγισης; Φορητά γραφεία; Πινακίδες ονομάτων; Χαλάκια γραφείου & καρέκλας; Καρότσια γραφείου; Εξοπλισμός γραφείου; Όργανα γραφείου; Διαχείριση χαρτιού; Αναλώσιμα παρουσίασης; Προμήθειες αποστολής
nb: Kontormateriell: Boktilbehør; Skrivebordsmatter; Arkivering og organisering; Generelt kontorutstyr; Varmeforsegler; Laptopstøtter; Navneskilt; Kontor- og stolmatter; Kontorvogner; Kontorutstyr; Kontorinstrumenter; Papirhåndtering; Presentasjonsutstyr; Fraktutstyr
es: Material de oficina: Accesorios para libros; Secafirmas y protectores de escritorio; Clasificación y organización; Productos generales; Selladoras de impulso; Escritorios portátiles; Placas de nombre; Alfombrillas para sillas y oficinas; Carritos de oficina; Equipos para oficina; Artículos de oficina; Manipulación del papel; Accesorios para presentaciones; Accesorios para envíos
zh-TW: 辦公室用品: 書本配件; 桌墊; 收納整理用品; 一般事務用品; 瞬熱式封口機; 膝上桌; 名牌; 辦公室/椅用地墊; 辦公室推車; 辦公室設備; 事務用品; 紙張處理設備; 簡報用品; 物品運送
fi: Toimistotarvikkeet: Kirjatarvikkeet; Työpöydän pehmusteet ja kirjoitusalustat; Arkistointi ja järjestys; Yleiset toimistotarvikkeet; Lämpösaumaajat; Sylipöydät; Nimikyltit; Toimisto- ja tuolimatot; Toimistovaunut; Toimistovarusteet; Toimistovälineet; Paperin käsittely; Esitystarvikkeet; Toimitustarvikkeet
pt-BR: Materiais de escritório: Acessórios para livros; Mata-borrões para escrivaninhas; Arquivamento e organização; Suprimentos em geral; Seladores de impulso; Mesas de colo; Placas para nomes; Tapetes de escritório e cadeira; Carrinhos de escritório; Equipamento para escritório; Instrumentos de escritório; Manuseio de papel; Suprimentos para apresentações; Suprimentos para remessas
it: Forniture per ufficio: Accessori per libri; Cuscinetti e tamponi assorbenti per scrivanie; Archiviazione e organizzazione; Forniture generiche per ufficio; Sigillatrici a impulsi; Scrittoio da tavolo; Targhette portanome; Tappetini per uffici e sedie; Carrelli per uffici; Dotazione per l'ufficio; Strumenti per ufficio; Soluzioni per la carta; Forniture per presentazioni; Forniture per spedizioni
sk-SK: Kancelárske potreby: Príslušenstvo pre knihy; Podložky na stôl; Kartotéka a organizácia; Všeobecné kancelárske potreby; Impulzné zváračky; Stojany na notebook; Menovky; Podložky na kancelárske stoličky; Kancelárske vozíky; Kancelárske vybavenie; Kancelárske nástroje; Manipulácia s papierom; Potreby na prezentáciu; Prepravný materiál
pl: Artykuły biurowe: Akcesoria do książek; Podkładki na biurko; Sortowanie i utrzymanie porządku; Artykuły różne; Zgrzewarki do folii; Przenośne biurka; Tabliczki z nazwiskiem; Maty biurowe; Wózki biurowe; Sprzęt biurowy; Akcesoria biurowe; Obróbka papieru; Sprzęt do prezentacji; Akcesoria do pakowania
sv: Kontorsmaterial: Boktillbehör; Skrivbordsunderlägg och läskpapper; Arkiv och organisering; Allmänt kontorsmaterial; Värmeförseglare; Knäskrivbord; Namnskyltar; Kontorsmattor och golvskydd; Kontorsvagnar; Kontorsutrustning; Kontorsinstrument; Pappershantering; Presentationsmaterial; Leveransmaterial
tr: Büro Malzemeleri: Kitap Aksesuarları; Sümenler; Dosyalama ve Organizasyon; Genel Ofis Malzemeleri; Poşet Ağzı Kapatma Makineleri; Laptop Minderleri; İsim Plakaları; Ofis ve Sandalye Minderleri; Ofis Arabaları; Ofis Ekipmanları; Ofis Aletleri; Kağıt İşleri; Sunum Malzemeleri; Nakliye Sarf Malzemeleri
th: อุปกรณ์สำนักงาน: อุปกรณ์หนังสือ; แผ่นรองและกระดาษซับหมึกบนโต๊ะ; การจัดเก็บเอกสารและการจัดระเบียบ; อุปกรณ์สำนักงานทั่วไป; เครื่องปิดปากถุงด้วยความร้อน; ถาดวางในรถ; ป้ายชื่อ; ที่รองเก้าอี้สำนักงาน; รถเข็นสำนักงาน; อุปกรณ์สำหรับสำนักงาน; เครื่องมือสำนักงาน; การจัดการกระดาษ; อุปกรณ์นำเสนองาน; อุปกรณ์สำหรับจัดส่งสินค้า
ja: オフィス用品: 書籍関連用品; デスクマット; ファイル・バインダー; 事務用消耗品; インパルスシーラー; ラップデスク; ネームプレート; オフィスマット・チェアマット; オフィスワゴン; オフィス機器; 事務用品; 書類整理; プレゼン用品; 梱包用品
hu: Irodai kellékek: Könyvkiegészítők; Asztalalátétek és felitatók; Tárolás és rendezés; Általános irodai kellékek; Impulzustömítők; Ölíróasztalok; Névtáblák; Irodai és székszőnyegek; Irodai kocsik; Irodai berendezések; Irodai eszközök; Papírkezelés; Prezentációs kellékek; Szállítási kellékek
sl-SI: Pisarniški material: Dodatki za knjige; Podloge za pisalne mize in vpojni papir; Zlaganje in urejanje dokumentov; Splošni pisarniški material; Impulzni varilniki; Mize za prenosne računalnike; Imenske tablice; Podloge za pisarniške mize in stole; Pisarniški vozički; Pisarniška oprema; Pisarniški pripomočki; Obdelava papirja; Pripomočki za predstavitve; Pripomočki za pripravo pošiljk
ro-RO: Consumabile de birou: Accesorii pentru cărți; Protecții pentru birou și sugative; Clasare și organizare; Consumabile generale de birou; Aparate de etanșare cu impuls; Măsuțe pentru laptop; Plăcuțe cu nume; Covorașe pentru birou și pentru scaune; Cărucioare pentru birou; Echipamente de birou; Instrumente de birou; Manipularea hârtiei; Consumabile de prezentare; Materiale pentru transport